District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.07

Tax on residents and nonresidents — Reduction of top rate to goal of 8% or lower.

Beginning February 1, 2000, in addition to the operative rate reductions provided for in this title, the Mayor and the Council shall consider reducing the highest individual income tax rate in § 47-1806.03 to a goal of 8% or lower, if:

(1)

the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report for the immediately preceding fiscal year shows that actual local source general fund revenue exceeds the original forecast of such revenue presented in the immediately preceding fiscal year’s budget submission to Congress;

(2)

The Chief Financial Officer certifies that less than half of the excess local source general fund revenue for the immediately preceding fiscal year is derived from non-recurring sources;

(3)

The Chief Financial Officer certifies that the nominal GDP growth is greater than or equal to 3.5%, and the real GDP growth is greater than or equal to 1.7%; and

(4)

The Mayor and the Council shall consider the need for further tax reductions in conjunction with other government needs.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2704(b), 46 DCR 6373

References in Text

“This title”, referred to in the introductory language of this section, is title XXVII of D.C. Law 13-38, the “Tax Parity Act of 1999”.